Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.210

Motion to reinstate.

Upon an order being made dissolving or modifying an order of injunction, the plaintiff may move the court to reinstate the order, and the court may, in its discretion, allow the motion, and appoint a time for hearing the same before the court, or a time and place for hearing before some judge thereof, and upon the hearing, the parties may produce such additional affidavits or depositions as the court shall direct, and the order of injunction shall be dissolved, modified, or reinstated, as the court or judge may deem right. Until the hearing of the motion to reinstate the order of injunction, the order to dissolve or modify it, shall be suspended.

[Code 1881 s 172; 1877 p 35 s 172; 1869 p 41 s 170; 1854 p 154 s 130; RRS s 738.]